Utah statutes.
57-8-31.   Disposition of property where insurance proceeds are insufficient for reconstruction.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration or bylaws, if the insurance proceeds are insufficient to reconstruct the building, damage to or destruction of the building shall be promptly repaired and restored by the manager or management committee, using proceeds of insurance, if any, on the building for that purpose, and the unit owners shall be liable for assessment for any deficiency. However, if three-fourths or more of the building is destroyed or substantially damaged and if the unit owners, by a vote of at least three-fourths of such unit owners, do not voluntarily, within 100 days after such destruction or damage, make provision for reconstruction, the manager or management committee shall record, with the county recorder, a notice setting forth such facts, and upon the recording of such notice:

(1)  The property shall be deemed to be owned in common by the unit owners;

(2)  The undivided interest in the property owned in common which shall appertain to each unit owner shall be the percentage of undivided interest previously owned by such owner in the common elements;

(3)  Any liens affecting any of the units shall be deemed to be transferred in accordance with the existing priorities to the undivided interest of the unit owner in the property; and

(4)  The property shall be subject to an action for partition at the suit of any unit owner, in which event the net proceeds of sale, together with the net proceeds of the insurance on the property, if any, shall be considered as one fund and shall be divided among all the unit owners in a percentage equal to the percentage of undivided interest owned by each owner in the property, after first paying out of the respective shares of the unit owners, to the extent sufficient for the purposes, all liens on the undivided interest in the property owned by each unit owner.

